Missouri, session 2026, HB3190.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 253.048, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 253.048, to read as follows:
253.048. 1. Within the state parks, the department shall accompany the display of the
flag of the United States and the flag of this state with the display of the MIA/POW flag,
which is designed to commemorate the service and sacrifice of members of the Armed Forces
of the United States who were prisoners of war or missing in action and with the display of
the Honor and Remember flag as an official recognition and in honor of fallen members of the
Armed Forces of the United States.
2. If a state park does not possess a POW/MIA flag, the department shall reach out to
local veterans' organizations to obtain a donated flag.
3. If the state park is unable to obtain a donated flag or if displaying the flag on the
existing flagpole would in any circumstance be inconsistent with the provisions of the state of
Missouri policy for display of national and state flags, the state park shall be exempt from this
section.
4. The Confederate Memorial State Historic Site shall fly a flag of the former
Confederate States of America over the graves of confederate soldiers at the cemetery.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3190 2
A flag of the former Confederate States of America shall be subordinate to the United
States of America flag in size and prominence of display.
✔